Massachusetts, session 194th, H4245.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1: Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the number of
members on the Mattapoisett Select Board, shall be increased from three (3) to five (5). They
shall annually elect a Chairperson from among its members.
Section 2: At the first Annual Town Election to occur following the passage of this act by
the Massachusetts General Court, three (3) Select Board Members shall be elected. The
candidate receiving the highest number of votes in that election shall serve a three (3) year term,
the candidate receiving the second highest number of votes shall serve a two (2) year term and
the candidate receiving the third highest number of votes shall serve a one (1) year term.
Thereafter, as the terms of Select Board members expire, successors shall be elected for terms of
three (3) years.
Section 3: This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1